Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1689SV (3) 91 dg/ko S.F. 174 Section 1. Section 232.46, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Placement of the child in a 3 supervised apartment living arrangement if the child has 4 previously and continuously lived in a qualified residential 5 treatment program, a shelter, or a combination of both, for a 6 period of not less than six months immediately preceding the 7 determination for placement in a supervised apartment living 8 arrangement, and the child is lacking family support needed to 9 successfully transition to independent living. 10 Sec. 2. Section 234.35, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. When a court has entered an order 13 transferring the legal custody of the child to a supervised 14 apartment living arrangement pursuant to section 232.46, 15 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6). However, 16 payment shall not be made for a supervised apartment living 17 arrangement unless the supervised apartment living arrangement 18 meets requirements as established by the department by rule. 19